Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.210

Clean energy technology workforce advisory committee—Duties—Membership.

(1) The board shall establish a clean energy technology workforce advisory committee. The goal of the clean energy technology workforce advisory committee is to advise policymakers on efforts to support the expansion of clean energy technology sectors and jobs by prioritizing transition of the existing skilled workforce to new industry sectors and providing training opportunities where needed to address gaps, as well as mitigating the impact of climate change policy transitions to workers, employers, and communities.

(2) The clean energy technology workforce advisory committee shall:

(a) Review workforce and business issues in direct employment in the energy sector, in its supply chain, and the impacts of the energy transition to dependent sectors; and

(b) Recommend strategies to prevent workforce displacement, to support job creation in clean energy technology sectors, and to provide support for workforce-related changes to businesses and for adversely impacted workers.

(3) Clean energy technology workforce advisory committee membership is open to all interested parties including, but not limited to, business and worker representatives from sectors of the economy affected by the transition to clean energy.

(4) The clean energy technology workforce advisory committee shall select a cochair representing business and a cochair representing workers to lead the committee. Board staff shall coordinate with the cochairs to ensure that input into and deliberations of the committee reflect a balance of employer and worker perspectives.

[ 2023 c 231 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 231: See note following RCW 43.41.470.